trunk/resultats/catalan_i.dic
absol/CSZ
abstragués/QZ
abstraient/CR
abstrauré/TZ
abstreu/CSZ
acreix/CSZ
acresqués/QZ
acull/CEUVYZ
admet/CSZ
admetent/CR
admetré/TZ
adorm/CUZ
adscrigués/QZ
adscriu/CSZ
advendré/TZ
advengués/QZ
aiguabat/CSZ
aiguabatent/CERVY
ajagués/QZ
ajauré/TZ
ajup/CUZ
alabat/BCSVYZ
alabatent/CR
aparegués/QZ
apareixeré/TZ
apercebent/CR
aprehendré/TZ
aprehengués/QZ
aprehèn/CSZ
aprenent/CFRVY
aprengués/QZ
arremet/CSZ
arremetré/TZ
arrup/CUZ
assegués/QZ
asseient/CR
atendré/TZ
atengués/QZ
ateny/CSZ
atenyent/CR
atragués/QZ
atrauré/TZ
atén/CSZ
avengués/QZ
barbull/CEU
batent/CER
batré/T
begués/Q
bestragués/Q
bestreu/CS
beu/CS
beuré/T
bevent/CER
bot/CES
brum/CEU
brunz/CU
bull/CEU
cabent/CR
caberé/T
caigués/Q
calent/CFR
calgués/Q
cartendré/T
cartengués/Q
carvengués/Q
carvèn/CS
cauré/T
cern/CS
cernent/CR
circumscrigués/Q
circumscriuré/T
cloent/CR
clogués/Q
clou/CS
cogués/Q
coldré/T
colent/CR
colgués/Q
colltorç/CS
combatent/CER
combatré/T
comet/CS
commogués/Q
commouré/T
commovent/CR
comparegués/Q
compareix/CS
complaent/CER
complagués/Q
complanyeré/T
complau/CS
compondré/T
component/CER
compongués/Q
comprengués/Q
compromet/CS
comprometent/CR
comprometré/T
concloent/CER
conclogués/Q
conclou/CS
conclouré/T
condolgués/Q
condorm/CU
conegués/Q
coneix/CS
coneixent/CR
coneixeré/T
confongués/Q
consent/CU
constreny/CS
constrenyent/CR
constrenyeré/T
consum/CEU
contengués/Q
contorcent/CR
contorceré/T
contrabat/CS
contragués/Q
contraient/CR
contrauré/T
contravengués/Q
contén/CS
convenceré/T
convengués/Q
convisqués/Q
conviu/CS
conviuré/T
convivint/CR
corfongués/Q
corprendré/T
corprenent/CR
corprengués/Q
corprèn/CS
correspongués/Q
corromp/CS
corrompent/CR
corrompré/T
cregués/Q
creix/CS
creixent/CER
creixeré/T
cresqués/Q
cull/CU
cus/CU
debat/CES
debatré/T
decaient/CR
decaigués/Q
decebré/T
decreix/CS
decreixent/CER
decresqués/Q
defendré/T
defengués/Q
degués/Q
demet/CS
demetent/CR
dependré/T
depengués/Q
desacull/CU
desaparegués/Q
desapareix/CS
desapareixent/CR
desaprendré/T
desaprengués/Q
desatenent/CR
desatengués/Q
desatén/CS
desavendré/T
desavengués/Q
desclogués/Q
descomplau/CS
descomplauré/T
descomponent/CR
descompongués/Q
descompromet/CS
descomprometré/T
desconegués/Q
desconeixent/CER
desconvendré/T
desconvengués/Q
descregués/Q
descreu/CS
descrigués/Q
descriuré/T
descrivint/CR
desentengués/Q
desentén/CS
desment/CU
desmereixent/CR
desmereixeré/T
desmeresqués/Q
desplaent/CER
desplagués/Q
desplau/CS
desplauré/T
desprendré/T
desprenent/CR
desprengués/Q
desprèn/CS
destorç/CS
destrenyent/CR
destrenyeré/T
desviu/CS
detendré/T
detengués/Q
detraient/CR
deu/CES
deuré/T
difonent/CR
difongués/Q
dissol/CS
dissoldré/T
distenent/CR
distengués/Q
distorceré/T
distraient/CR
distreu/CS
dol/CES
doldré/T
dolgués/Q
dorm/CU
embevent/CR
emet/CSZ
emetré/TZ
empenyent/CR
emprendré/TZ
emprengués/QZ
emprèn/CSZ
encenent/CR
enclogués/QZ
enclouré/TZ
encén/CSZ
enfondent/CR
entrebat/CSZ
entrebatent/CR
entrebatré/TZ
entreplogués/QZ
entreplou/CSZ
entreplouré/TZ
entreplovent/CR
entresent/CUZ
entrevendré/TZ
entrevengués/QZ
equival/CSZ
esbatent/CR
esbatré/TZ
escaigués/QZ
escau/CSZ
escometent/CR
escometré/TZ
escriu/CSZ
escruix/CUYZ
escull/CEUVYZ
escup/CUZ
esdevendré/TZ
esdevengués/QZ
esmuny/CUZ
espenyent/CR
espremeré/TZ
estenent/CR
estorceré/TZ
estorç/CSZ
estrenyent/CR
estén/CSZ
exclogués/QZ
exclouré/TZ
expenent/CR
expèn/CSZ
extragués/QZ
extrauré/TZ
fen/CS
fenent/CER
fenyeré/T
fon/CES
fonent/CR
fongués/Q
fotré/T
fum/CES
fument/CR
funy/CU
gruny/CEU
heuré/TZ
incloent/CR
inclou/CSZ
infondré/TZ
infongués/QZ
inscriu/CSZ
inscrivint/CR
interrompré/TZ
intervengués/QZ
ireix/CSZ
ireixent/CR
ireixeré/TZ
iré/TZ
jagués/Q
jaient/CER
jeu/CS
lleuré/T
malentenent/CR
malentengués/Q
malentén/CS
malmetré/T
malprenent/CR
malprèn/CS
malvendré/T
malvengués/Q
malveuent/CR
malviu/CS
malviuré/T
mamprenent/CR
mamprengués/Q
mamprèn/CS
mantendré/T
marfon/CS
marfondré/T
marfonent/CR
marfongués/Q
ment/CEU
menystendré/T
menystengués/Q
mereix/CS
mereixent/CER
metré/T
mogués/Q
mol/CES
molent/CR
mor/CU
mouré/T
muny/CU
noent/CR
nogués/Q
nom/CES
nouré/T
obvendré/TZ
obvengués/QZ
ofenent/CR
ofèn/CSZ
oldré/TZ
olgués/QZ
omet/CSZ
ometent/CR
pareixeré/T
peixent/CR
perbull/CU
percebré/T
percut/CU
perd/CS
perdent/CR
permetré/T
pernabat/CS
pernabatent/CR
pertanyeré/T
pervengués/Q
perviu/CS
perviuré/T
pervivint/CR
plagués/Q
planyent/CER
plau/CS
plauré/T
pon/CS
pondré/T
ponent/CER
pongués/Q
premor/CU
pren/CES
prendré/T
prenent/CR
prescrigués/Q
pressent/CU
presum/CU
pretendré/T
pretenent/CR
pretén/CS
prevalgués/Q
prevendré/T
promet/CS
prometent/CR
promogués/Q
promouré/T
prorromp/CS
prorrompent/CR
proscriuré/T
provengués/Q
puny/CEU
raent/CER
rau/CS
rauré/T
reabsolgués/Q
readmet/CS
readmetent/CR
readmetré/T
rebat/CES
rebatent/CER
rebatré/T
rebegués/Q
rebevent/CR
rebot/CES
rebotré/T
rebull/CEU
recaient/CR
recauré/T
reclogués/Q
reclou/CS
recoent/CR
recompondré/T
recompongués/Q
reconeix/CS
reconeixent/CER
reconvendré/T
reconvengués/Q
recreix/CS
recreixeré/T
recull/CEU
recus/CU
reescrigués/Q
reescrivint/CR
refon/CS
refondré/T
remetent/CR
remogués/Q
remol/CS
remoldré/T
removent/CR
reprendré/T
reprengués/Q
reprèn/CS
resolent/CR
respon/CS
respondré/T
respongués/Q
ressent/CU
ressurt/CU
restrenyent/CR
ret/CES
retonent/CR
retongués/Q
retorceré/T
retorç/CS
retraient/CR
retreu/CS
retrotragués/Q
retrotraient/CR
retrovendré/T
retrovèn/CS
retruny/CEU
revencent/CR
revengués/Q
reviu/CS
reviuré/T
revivint/CR
rigués/Q
riu/CES
romanent/CER
romp/CS
salprendré/T
salprenent/CR
salprengués/Q
sent/CU
seu/BCEFS
sobrecreixent/CR
sobrecresqués/Q
sobreentén/CS
sobreescrigués/Q
sobreescriuré/T
sobreescrivint/CR
sobreprèn/CS
sobresegués/Q
sobreseient/CR
sobresurt/CU
sobreval/CS
sobrevendré/T
sobrevengués/Q
sobrevivint/CR
sol/CEFS
solgués/Q
somovent/CR
somrigués/Q
somriu/CS
somriuré/T
sorprenent/CER
sostengués/Q
sostreu/CS
sotaescrigués/Q
sotaescriuré/T
sotaescrivint/CR
sotbat/CS
sotmetent/CR
subscriu/CS
subvendré/T
subvengués/Q
surt/CEU
suspenent/CR
tem/CES
tengués/Q
terratrement/CR
terratremeré/T
tol/CS
tonent/CR
tongués/Q
torç/CS
traient/CR
trametré/T
transcrigués/Q
transcriu/CS
transcrivint/CR
transmet/CS
transmetent/CR
trauré/T
treu/CES
ullprenent/CR
ullprengués/QZ
val/CES
vencent/CR
venceré/T
vengués/Q
venç/CS
vivint/CR
